Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Voting

271B.7-200.
Shareholders’ list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare a list of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to notice of a shareholders’ meeting. The list shall be arranged by voting group (and within each voting group by class or series of shares) and show the address of and number of shares held by each shareholder.

The shareholders’ list shall be available for inspection by any shareholder, beginning five (5) business days before the meeting for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, at the corporation’s principal office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. A shareholder, his agent, or attorney shall be entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the requirements of subsection (3) of KRS

271B.16-020

, to copy the list, during regular business hours and at his expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

The corporation shall make the shareholders’ list available at the meeting, and any shareholder, his agent, or attorney shall be entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment.

Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders’ list shall not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 56, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.7-210.
Voting entitlement of shares.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section or unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, each outstanding share, regardless of class, shall be entitled to one (1) vote on each matter voted on at a shareholders’ meeting. Only shares shall be entitled to vote.

Absent special circumstances, the shares of a corporation shall not be entitled to vote if they are owned, directly or indirectly, by an entity, domestic or foreign, and the corporation controls, directly or indirectly, the entity’s determination to vote, and how to vote, the shares.

Subsection (2) of this section shall not limit the power of a corporation to vote any shares, including its own shares, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.

Redeemable shares shall not be entitled to vote after notice of redemption is mailed to the holders and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution under an irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price on surrender of the shares.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
57, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, §
62, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
62, effective July 15, 2010.

271B.7-220.
Proxies.

A shareholder may vote his or her shares in person or by proxy.

A shareholder, or his or her agent or attorney-in-fact, may appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the shareholder by signing an appointment form or by an electronic transmission. An electronic transmission shall contain, or be accompanied by, information from which one can determine that the shareholder, the shareholder’s agent, or the shareholder’s attorney-in-fact authorized the electronic transmission.

An appointment of a proxy shall be effective when a signed appointment form or an electronic transmission of the appointment is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment shall be valid for eleven (11) months unless a longer period is expressly provided in the appointment form.

An appointment of a proxy shall be revocable unless the appointment form or electronic transmission states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. Appointments coupled with an interest include the appointment of:

A pledgee;

A person who purchased or agreed to purchase the shares;

A creditor of the corporation who extended it credit under terms requiring the appointment;

An employee of the corporation whose employment contract requires the appointment; or

A party to a voting agreement created under KRS

271B.7-310

.

The death or incapacity of the shareholder appointing a proxy shall not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy’s authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises his authority under the appointment.

An appointment made irrevocable under subsection (4) of this section shall be revocable when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished. The revocation of an appointment under this subsection shall not be effective until the secretary of the corporation has received written notice of the revocation.

A transferee for value of shares subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if he did not know of its existence when he acquired the shares and the existence of the irrevocable appointment was not noted conspicuously on the certificate representing the shares or on the information statement for shares without certificates.

Subject to KRS

271B.7-240

and to any express limitation on the proxy’s authority stated in the appointment form or electronic transmission, a corporation shall be entitled to accept the proxy’s vote or other action as that of the shareholder making the appointment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 58, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 16, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

271B.7-230.
Shares held by nominees.

A corporation may establish a procedure by which the beneficial owner of shares that are registered in the name of a nominee is recognized by the corporation as the shareholder. The extent of this recognition may be determined in the procedure.

The procedure may set forth:

The types of nominees to which it applies;

The rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a beneficial owner;

The manner in which the procedure is selected by the nominee;

The information that must be provided when the procedure is selected;

The period for which selection of the procedure is effective; and

Other aspects of the rights and duties created.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 59, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.7-240.
Corporation’s acceptance of votes and persons authorized to vote shares.

If the name signed on or submitted with a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name or electronic signature of a shareholder, the corporation if acting in good faith shall be entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder. For purposes of this section, a telegram or cablegram appearing to have been transmitted by the proper person, or a photographic, photostatic, or equivalent reproduction of a writing appointing a proxy may be accepted by the corporation, if acting in good faith, as a sufficient, signed appointment form.

If the name signed on or submitted with a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the name or electronic signature of its shareholder, the corporation if, acting in good faith, shall nevertheless be entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

The shareholder is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment; or

Two (2) or more persons are the shareholder as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one (1) of the co-owners and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the co-owners.

The corporation shall be entitled to reject a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder or, in the case of an electronic record, to affix the shareholder’s electronic signature to the electronic record.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section or KRS

271B.7-220

(2) shall not be liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section or KRS

271B.7-220

(2) shall be valid, unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

Shares standing in the name of another corporation, domestic or foreign, may be voted by either the president of such corporation or by proxy appointed by him, unless the board of directors of such other corporation authorizes another person to vote such shares.

Shares held by an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator may be voted by him, either in person or by proxy, without a transfer of such shares into his name. Shares standing in the name of a trustee may be voted by him, either in person or by proxy, but no trustee shall be entitled to vote shares held by him without a transfer of such shares into his name.

Where shares are held jointly by three (3) or more fiduciaries acting under an instrument becoming effective after June 30, 1946, the will of the majority of such fiduciaries shall control the manner of voting or the giving of a proxy, unless the instrument or order appointing the fiduciaries otherwise directs. Where, in any case, fiduciaries are equally divided upon the manner of voting shares jointly held by them, any court of competent jurisdiction may, upon petition filed by any of the fiduciaries, or by any beneficiary, appoint an additional person to act with the fiduciaries in determining the manner in which the shares shall be voted upon the particular questions as to which the fiduciaries are divided.

Shares standing in the name of a receiver may be voted by such receiver, and shares held by or under the control of a receiver may be voted by such receiver without the transfer thereof into his name if authority so to do be contained in an appropriate order of the court by which such receiver was appointed.

A shareholder whose shares are pledged shall be entitled to vote such shares until the shares have been transferred into the name of the pledgee, and thereafter the pledgee shall be entitled to vote the share so transferred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 60, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 17, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

271B.7-250.
Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those shares exists with respect to that matter. Unless the articles of incorporation or this chapter provide otherwise, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the voting group shall constitute a quorum of that voting group for action on that matter.

Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting, it shall be deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting, unless a new record date is or must be set for that adjourned meeting.

If a quorum exists, action on a matter (other than the election of directors) by a voting group shall be approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast opposing the action, unless the articles of incorporation or this chapter require a greater number of affirmative votes.

An amendment of articles of incorporation adding, changing, or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater than specified in subsection (1) or (3) of this section shall be governed by KRS

271B.7-270

.

The election of directors shall be governed by KRS

271B.7-280

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 61, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.7-260.
Action by single and multiple voting groups.

If the articles of incorporation or this chapter provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter shall be taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in KRS

271B.7-250

.

If the articles of incorporation or this chapter provide for voting by two (2) or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter shall be taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in KRS

271B.7-250

. Action may be taken by one (1) voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 62, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.7-270.
Greater quorum or voting requirements.

The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater quorum or voting requirement for shareholders (or voting groups of shareholders) than is provided for by this chapter.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
63, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, §
63, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
63, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

271B.7-280.
Voting for directors — Cumulative voting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, directors are elected by a plurality of votes cast by the shares entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present. A “plurality” means that the individuals with the largest number of votes are elected as directors up to the maximum number of directors to be chosen at the election.

Shareholders do not have the right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the articles of incorporation so provide.

A statement included in the articles of incorporation that “all, or a designated group of, shareholders are entitled to cumulate their votes for directors,” or words of similar import, means that the shareholders designated are entitled to multiply the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two (2) or more candidates.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 64, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 18, effective November 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137, sec. 179, effective June 26, 2007 provided: The General Assembly finds and declares that the amendment of KRS

271B.6-210

,

271B.6-230

,

271B.7-040

,

271B.7-280

, and

271B.8-080

, as provided for in 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 102, secs. 10, 11, 15, 18, and 19, respectively, are and were effective as of November 15, 2002.

(11/15/2002). 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 102, sec. 22, provides that this section “shall take effect November 15, 2002, if a constitutional amendment proposing to amend Sections 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 195, 198, 200, 202, 203, 205, 207 and 208 of the Constitution of Kentucky relating to corporations is enacted by the General Assembly and approved by the voters in the November, 2002 general election.” Otherwise, [this section] shall be void.

A constitutional amendment proposing to amend 11 of those 13 sections of the Constitution was enacted by the General Assembly and approved by the voters. During the 2002 Regular Session, the General Assembly enacted 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 341, which proposed to amend Sections 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 198, 200, 202, 203, 207, and 208 of the Constitution of Kentucky. The voters approved that amendment in the November, 2002 general elections.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Young, Modernizing Kentucky’s Corporate Laws, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.